Illinois, session 104th, SB1592.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 11-1433 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-1433 new)7    Sec. 11-1433. Third-party delivery service; zero-emission 8deliveries.9    (a) As used in this Section, "third-party delivery 10service" has the meaning given to that term in the Fair Food 11and Retail Delivery Act.12    (b) Beginning on January 1, 2030, a third-party delivery 13service shall not employ or contract with a person to deliver 14goods from a store or restaurant unless the person making the 15delivery uses a non-carbon emitting mode of transportation. 16This subsection does not apply to a delivery that requires a 17person to travel 15 miles or more to complete the delivery.18    (c) A third-party delivery service that violates this 19Section is subject to a business offense not to exceed $1,000. 20    (d) A home rule municipality may not regulate deliveries 21pertaining to third-party delivery services in a manner 22inconsistent with this Section. This Section is a limitation 23under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the   SB1592- 2 -LRB104 11912 SPS 22003 b1Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule 2units of powers and functions exercised by the State.